District of Columbia statutes.
7-857.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Critical congenital heart disease” means a group of heart defects that cause serious, life-threatening symptoms and require intervention within the first days or first year of life.

(2)

“Health benefit plan” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 31-3301.01(20).

(3)

“Health insurer” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 31-3301.01(22).

(4)

“Hospital” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 44-501(a)(1).

(5)

“Maternity center” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 44-501(a)(2).

(6)

“Nurse-midwife” means a registered nurse certified pursuant to 17 DCMR § 5800 et seq.

(7)

“Pulse oximetry” means the non-invasive procedure used to measure oxygen levels in the blood.

Sept. 17, 2015, D.C. Law 21-20, § 2, 62 DCR 8845